Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 13 Ad Valorem Taxation
§ 39-13-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. The following shall apply:

Any person or his agent who wishes to review his property tax assessment or who contests his property tax assessment or valuation in a timely manner pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section is entitled to review statements of consideration for properties of like use and geographic area available to the county assessor in determining the value of the property at issue as provided under paragraph (b)(i) of this section. During a review, the county assessor shall disclose information sufficient to permit identification of the real estate parcels used by the county assessor in determining the value of the property at issue and provide the person or his agent papers of all information, including statements of consideration, the assessor relied upon in determining the property value and including statements of consideration for properties of like use and geographic area which were available to the assessor and are requested by the person or his agent. The county assessor shall, upon request, provide the person or his agent a statement indicating why a certain property was not used in determining the value of the property at issue. The county assessor and the contestant shall disclose those statements of consideration to the county board of equalization in conjunction with any hearing before the board with respect to the value or assessment of that property. As used in this paragraph:

A “review” is considered the initial meetings between the taxpayer and the county assessor’s office pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section;

“Contest” means the filing of a formal appeal pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section;

“Geographic area” may include any area requested by the property owner or his agent within the boundaries of the county in which the subject property is located.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person wishing to contest an assessment of his property shall file not later than thirty (30) days after the date of the assessment schedule properly sent pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b)(vii), a statement with the county assessor specifying the reasons why the assessment is incorrect. For purposes of this paragraph, if a statement of reasons is mailed or sent by electronic transmission by the person assessed, it shall be deemed timely filed if it is postmarked or transmitted not later than thirty (30) days after the mailing or the electronic transmission of the notification of the assessment schedule. The county assessor shall provide a copy to the county clerk as clerk of the county board of equalization. The county assessor and the person contesting the assessment, or his agent, shall disclose witnesses and exchange information, evidence and documents relevant to the appeal, including sales information from relevant statements of consideration if requested, no later than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled county board of equalization hearing. The assessor shall specifically identify the sales information used to determine market value of the property under appeal. A county board of equalization may receive evidence relative to any assessment and may require the person assessed or his agent or attorney to appear before it, be examined and produce any documents relating to the assessment. The appeal may be dismissed if any person willfully neglects or refuses to attend a meeting of a county board of equalization and be examined or answer any material question upon the board’s request. The state board of equalization shall adopt rules to be followed by any county board of equalization when conducting appeals under this subsection. All hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the rules adopted by the state board of equalization. Each hearing shall be recorded electronically or by a court reporter or a qualified stenographer or transcriptionist. The taxpayer may present any evidence that is relevant, material or not repetitious, including expert opinion testimony, to rebut the presumption in favor of a valuation asserted by the county assessor. The county attorney or his designee may represent the county board or the assessor, but not both. The assessor may be represented by an attorney and the board may hire a hearing officer. All deliberations of the board shall be in public. The county board of equalization may affirm the assessor’s valuation or find in favor of the taxpayer and remand the case back to the assessor. The board shall make specific written findings and conclusions as to the evidence presented not later than October 1 of each year;

A county assessor may appeal any decision or order of the county board of equalization to the state board of equalization;

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department may appeal to the board. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds therefor. A complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken shall be transmitted to the board in a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations;

Any person including the state of Wyoming aggrieved by any order issued by the board, or any county board of equalization whose decision has been reversed or modified by the state board of equalization, may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the property or some part thereof is situated;

The board and department shall not compromise or reduce the tax liability of any person owing a tax to the state. of Wyoming, except that the department for good cause, may, but is not required to, compromise and settle with the taxpayer for payment of any taxes owed to the state of Wyoming which tax liability is disputed in good faith by the taxpayer and which liability has not been settled in law. In case the department and the person owing the tax do not agree with respect to tax liability, the department shall by order, assess and levy the full amount of tax due and any person aggrieved by the assessment may appeal the decision to the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 106, § 2.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

Within one (1) year following an illegal assessment, levy or collection of taxes an action may be filed in district court to enjoin the illegal assessment, levy or collection. The action shall be against the county assessor in the case of an illegal assessment, the governmental entity which levies an illegal levy, the county treasurer if the levy is entered on the tax list, or against the governmental entity if the taxes were collected and paid to the entity;

If any person pays any tax, or portion thereof, found to have been erroneous or illegal, the board of county commissioners shall direct the county treasurer to refund the erroneous or illegal payment to the taxpayer. When an increase in the value of any product is subject to the approval of any agency of the United States of America or the state of Wyoming, or of any court, the increased value shall be subject to property taxation. In the event the increase in value is disapproved, either in whole or in part, then the amount of tax which has been paid on the disapproved part of the value shall be considered excess tax. Within one (1) year following the final determination of value, any person who has paid any such excess tax may apply for a refund, and the board of county commissioners shall refund the amount of excess tax paid. Any refund may, at the discretion of the board of county commissioners, be made in the form of credit against future tax payments for a period not to exceed five (5) years. Unless otherwise agreed to by the taxpayer, refunds in the form of credit against future tax payments shall be made in no less than equal annual amounts. The board of county commissioners shall not provide a credit for interest on the excess tax paid unless the taxes are paid under protest due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization and the taxpayer prevails in the appeal;

Repealed effective January 1, 2008.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 101, § 1.

The following shall apply to the property tax refund program:

On or before the first Monday in June, upon the filing of an affidavit demonstrating an adequate showing that he is qualified under subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, any person may apply to the county treasurer or department of revenue for a property tax refund from property taxes paid with any applicable interest and penalties on or before the first Monday in June for the preceding calendar year upon his principal residence including the land upon which the residence is located. An applicant shall have been a resident of this state for not less than five (5) years prior to applying for a refund under this paragraph. Subject to legislative appropriation, the affidavit shall include information as required by rule and regulation on a form approved by the department of revenue. The tax refund granted shall be as provided by subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

Gross income as used in this subparagraph shall be defined by the department through rules and regulations. Such gross income shall be verified by federal income tax returns which shall accompany the application for refund, if federal income tax returns were required and filed, or whatever other means necessary as determined by the department through rules and regulations. The tax refund for qualifying persons shall be in the form of a refund of any ad valorem tax due and timely paid upon the person’s principal residence for the preceding calendar year in the amount specified in this paragraph. The department shall issue all refunds due under this paragraph on or before September 30 of the year in which application is made for the refund. Any person shall qualify for a refund in the amount specified under this paragraph if the person’s gross income including the total household income of which the person is a member does not exceed the greater of three-fourths (3/4) of the median gross household income for the applicant’s county of residence or the state, as determined annually by the economic analysis division of the department of administration and information. Additionally, no person shall qualify for a refund under this paragraph unless the person has total household assets as defined by the department of revenue through rules and regulations of not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) per adult member of the household as adjusted annually by the statewide average Wyoming cost-of-living index published by the economic analysis division of the department of administration and information, excluding the following:

The value of the home for which the taxpayer is seeking a tax refund;

One (1) personal motor vehicle per adult in the household;

Household furnishings and personal property;

Assets held in an individual retirement account (IRA) or other bona fide pension plan;

The cash value of any life insurance policies held;

Assets held in a medical savings account.

A refund granted under this paragraph shall not exceed one-half (1/2) of the applicant’s prior year’s property tax, but in no instance shall the amount of refund exceed one-half (1/2) of the median residential property tax liability for the applicant’s county of residence as determined annually by the department of revenue;

Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit or affect requirements for property to be listed, valued and assessed by the county assessor pursuant to law. Each year the county shall publicize in a manner reasonably designed to notify all residents of the county the provisions of this paragraph and the method by which eligible persons may obtain a refund;

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this paragraph.

Each county shall have the option to implement a county-optional property tax refund program which, is in addition to the program established under paragraph (v) of this subsection, adoption of rules as required by subparagraph (H) of this paragraph. The following shall apply to a county-optional property tax refund program implemented under this paragraph:

On or before the first Monday in June, an applicant may apply to the county treasurer for a property tax refund from property taxes paid on or before the first Monday in June for the preceding calendar year upon the applicant’s principal residence including the land upon which the residence is located. An applicant shall have been a resident of this state for not less than five (5) years before applying for a refund under this paragraph. The affidavit shall include information as required by rule of the county on a form approved by the county. The tax refund granted shall be as provided by subparagraph (E) of this paragraph;

The applicant shall attest that the property for which the applicant applies for a refund under this paragraph was occupied for more than nine (9) months of the preceding calendar year for which the applicant applies for a refund;

Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, any person in the participating county shall qualify for a refund in the amount specified under this paragraph if any ad valorem tax due upon the person’s principal residence in the county for the preceding calendar year was timely paid and if the person’s gross income including the total household income of which the person is a member does not exceed an amount as determined by the county, which shall not exceed three-fourths (3/4) of the median gross household income for the county, as determined annually by the economic analysis division of the department of administration and information. As used in this subparagraph “gross income” shall have the same meaning as defined by department rules promulgated under paragraph (v) of this subsection. Gross income shall be verified by federal income tax returns, which shall accompany the application for refund, if federal income tax returns were required and filed, or by whatever other means necessary as determined by the county through rules;

No person shall qualify for a refund under this paragraph unless the person has total household assets not to exceed an amount as determined by the county which shall not exceed an amount as provided in subparagraph (v)(B) of this subsection and as defined by the department through rules promulgated under subparagraph (v)(B) of this subsection;

The tax refund for qualifying persons shall be in the form of a refund of any ad valorem tax due and timely paid upon the person’s principal residence for the preceding calendar year in the amount specified in this paragraph. A refund granted under this paragraph shall not exceed a percentage of the applicant’s prior year’s property tax as determined by the county subject to this paragraph, which shall not exceed one-half (1/2) of the applicant’s prior year’s property tax. In no instance shall the amount of the refund exceed one-half (1/2) of the median residential property tax liability for the applicant’s county as determined annually by the department of revenue. The county shall issue all refunds due under this paragraph on or before September 30 of the year in which application is made for the refund;

A refund granted under this paragraph shall be funded only from the revenues of the county opting to implement that county’s county-optional property tax refund program;

Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit or affect requirements for property to be listed, valued and assessed by the county assessor pursuant to law. Each year a county opting to implement a county-optional property tax refund program shall publicize in a manner reasonably designed to notify all residents of the county the provisions of this paragraph and the method by which eligible persons may obtain a refund;

A county implementing a county-optional property tax refund program under this paragraph shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this paragraph.

Credits. The following shall apply:

The following shall apply to the home owner’s tax credit:

Subject to subparagraph (G) of this paragraph, a person who occupies a specified homestead as his home and principal residence is entitled to a property tax credit in the amount provided by subparagraph (D) or (E) of this paragraph. No more than one (1) home owner’s tax credit shall be allowed on the same piece of property during any year;

A person who wishes to claim a home owner’s tax credit shall file a claim under penalties of perjury with the county assessor on or before the fourth Monday in May on forms provided by the department of revenue. The forms may be mailed to property owners and may be published in a newspaper by county assessors and the mailed or published form may be filled out and returned by mail or in person to county assessors. The applicant shall list the property claimed to be subject to the tax credit, state that the property is the principal place of residence of the applicant and state that no other home owner’s claims have been or will be submitted by the applicant during the remainder of the calendar year. False claims are punishable as provided by W.S.

6-5-303

;

In completing the assessment roll of the county the county assessor shall indicate the assessed value used as a base for computation of the home owner’s tax credit and the county treasurer shall collect from the property owner the amount of tax due minus the amount of tax credit allowed. On or before September 1, county assessors shall certify the credits granted pursuant to this section to the department. On or before October 1 the state treasurer out of funds appropriated for that purpose shall reimburse each county treasurer for the amount of taxes which would have been collected if the property tax credit had not been granted. The county treasurer shall distribute to each governmental entity the actual amount of revenue lost due to the tax credit;

The tax credit under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is one thousand four hundred sixty dollars ($1,460.00) times the mill levy to be applied against the property if the dwelling and land, not to exceed two (2) acres on which the dwelling is located, have a combined assessed value of less than three thousand nine hundred dollars ($3,900.00), or five hundred ninety dollars ($590.00) times the mill levy to be applied against the property if the dwelling and land, not to exceed two (2) acres on which the dwelling is located, have a combined assessed value of at least three thousand nine hundred dollars ($3,900.00) but less than five thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($5,850.00) and if:

The dwelling and land on which the dwelling is located are owned by the same person or entity; and

The dwelling has been occupied in Wyoming since the beginning of the calendar year by the applicant.

The tax credit under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is five hundred ninety dollars ($590.00) times the mill levy to be applied against the property if:

The dwelling has an assessed value of less than five thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($5,850.00); and

The land on which the dwelling is located is not owned by the same person or entity owning the dwelling; and

The dwelling has been occupied in Wyoming since the beginning of the calendar year by the applicant.

As used in this paragraph:

“Applicant” means:

A person who occupies and owns a homestead either solely or jointly with his spouse;

A person who occupies a homestead as a vendee in possession under a contract of sale;

A person who occupies a homestead owned by a corporation primarily formed for the purpose of farming or ranching if the person is a shareholder or is related to a shareholder of the corporation; or

A person who occupies a homestead owned by a partnership primarily formed for the purpose of farming or ranching if the person is a partner or is related to a partner in the partnership.

“Dwelling” means a house, trailer house, mobile home, transportable home or other dwelling place.

Every person or entity holding an escrow for the payment of taxes on property owned by another shall notify the owner of the property of the amount of home owner’s tax credit allowed to the owner under this paragraph annually on or before October 1;

The home owner’s tax credit authorized by this paragraph is allowed during a fiscal year only if the legislature has appropriated monies that the department determines to be necessary to reimburse all local governments for tax losses created by this paragraph during that fiscal year. When it appears to the state treasurer that the monies appropriated are insufficient to reimburse the counties as provided herein, the money available shall be prorated among the counties at an amount less than one hundred percent (100%);

The purpose of this paragraph is to provide general property tax relief for certain persons who own their residences through a system of tax credits and general fund appropriations. The relief provided is to offset in part the general tax burden. Thus, the tax relief provided is determined by reference to property tax assessment and collection mechanisms but is not limited to property tax relief nor formulated upon legislative power to relieve such taxes. It is for the general relief of taxes and grounded upon general legislative power. In adopting this method of reimbursement of property taxes and providing that no local government shall incur any loss of property tax revenue under subparagraph (H) of this paragraph, any bond issues or other matters relying upon the assessed value of a local government for computation shall be predicated upon the assessed value of the local government before computation of tax credits under this paragraph.

Redemption. The following shall apply:

Real property sold for delinquent taxes may be redeemed by the legal owner after the date of sale but before a valid tax deed application has been filed and accepted by the county treasurer pursuant to W.S. 39-13-108(e)(v)(A), by paying to the county treasurer to be held subject to order of the holder of the certificate of purchase, the amounts provided by paragraph (iv) or (v) of this subsection. The county treasurer, if satisfied the person has a right to redeem the property, shall issue to the legal owner or his assigns a certificate of redemption stating the facts of the sale substantially as contained in the certificate of purchase, the date of redemption, the amount paid and the name of the person redeeming the property. The county treasurer shall note the redemption in his records and notify the holder of the certificate of purchase;

A mortgagee of real property, or a purchaser of real property at a mortgage foreclosure sale, shall have the right to partially redeem a certificate of purchase as to that portion of real property in which the mortgagee or purchaser holds an interest. The procedure for partial redemption of certificates of purchase shall be the same as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection, except that the certificate of redemption shall state the appropriate facts of the partial redemption. A partial redemption under this subsection shall not affect the legal status of a certificate of purchase to the extent of any real property remaining unredeemed;

An amount not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be collected by the county treasurer to be credited to the county treasury for the issuance of a certificate of redemption;

A person redeeming real property from a person holding a certificate of purchase shall pay the following amounts, excluding attorney’s fees, before being entitled to a certificate of redemption:

The amount for which the property was sold at the tax sale, or in the case of a partial redemption, the amount allocated by the county assessor to the portion being redeemed, including the charges provided by W.S. 39-13-108(e)(ix)(A) and (B) plus:

Three percent (3%); plus

Interest at eight percent (8%) per annum since the date of sale except fifteen percent (15%) per annum on all property sold at date of 1982 tax sale and thereafter.

The amount of taxes accruing since the date of sale plus eight percent (8%) per annum if the subsequent taxes were paid by the holder of the certificate of purchase dated before 1982 tax sale. Commencing at date of 1982 tax sale, interest on subsequent taxes if paid by the holder of the certificate of purchase shall be fifteen percent (15%) per annum;

Actual expenses, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) incurred by the holder of the certificate of purchase if redemption occurs after the holder has given notice of his intent to apply for a treasurer’s deed, upon filing a sworn statement of the expense with the county treasurer.

A person redeeming real property from a county holding a certificate of purchase shall pay the amounts provided by subdivision (iv)(A)(II) and subparagraph (iv)(B) of this subsection before being entitled to a certificate of redemption.

Escrow. If taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the county treasurer shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in an interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution under W.S.

39-13-111

until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the county treasurer shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the county an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided under W.S.

39-13-111

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 12, § 1; ch. 17, § 1; 2001, ch. 7, § 1; 2003, ch. 12, § 1; 2004, ch. 121, § 1; 2005, ch. 65, § 1; 2008, ch. 101, § 1; 2009, ch. 48, § 1, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 20, § 1; 2011, ch. 127, § 1; 2014 ch. 106, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 20, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2020 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, rewrote (c)(iii).

The 2005 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, substituted “five (5) years” for “ten (10) years” in (c)(iii)(A); in (c)(iii)(B), deleted “and shall include, at minimum, all sources of taxable and nontaxable income of members of the household and all taxable entities controlled by members of the household” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “the greater of one-half (1/2) of the median gross household income for the applicant's county of residence or the state” for “one-half (1/2) of the median household income for the applicant's county of residence” in the next-to-last sentence, and substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) per adult member of the household” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” in the last sentence.

The 2008 amendment,

added (c)(iv).

Laws 2008, ch. 101, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, added (b)(vi).

Laws 2009, ch. 48, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 73, §§ 1 and 2, substituted “paid with any applicable interest and penalties on or before the first Monday in June” for “timely paid” in (c)(iv)(A); in (c)(iv)(B), substituted “three-fourths (3/4)” for “two-thirds (2/3),” “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00),” and added (c)(iv)(B)(VI); repealed former (c)(iv)(F) which read: “Any refund as provided by this paragraph shall be reduced by the dollar amount received by the person applying for the refund for the preceding calendar year of any exemption received for veterans under W.S.

39-13-105

, any home owner's tax credit under paragraph (d)(i) of this section, or any property tax deferral under W.S. 39-13-107(b)(iii)”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 73, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2009.

While neither of the amendments gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

in (b)(i), added the second sentence, and deleted “or postmark date” following “thirty (30) days after the date” and “whichever is later” following “pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b)(vii)” in the third sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(vi), added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015, in (b)(i), deleted the first sentence which read: “The county assessor shall notify any person whose property assessment has been increased by the county board of equalization of the increase. Any person wishing to review an assessment of his property shall contact the county assessor not later than thirty (30) days after the date of the assessment schedule.”; in the fourth sentence, substituted “thirty (30)” for “fifteen (15)”; in the seventh sentence, substituted “The appeal may be dismissed if any person” for “No adjustment in an assessment shall be granted to or on behalf of any person who”; deleted the former last sentence which read: “Minutes of the examination shall be taken and filed with the county clerk”; added the present eighth through sixteenth sentences; in (b)(iii), substituted “A complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken shall be transmitted to the board in a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations” for “The department shall, within a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken”; and repealed former (b)(vi) which read: “In any appeal to a county board of equalization authorized by this section, the taxpayer may present any credible evidence, including expert opinion testimony, to rebut the presumption in favor of a valuation asserted by the county assessor. The board shall make specific findings and conclusions as to the evidence presented.”

The 2015 amendment

added (c)(v).

Laws 2015, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, redesignated former (a) as the introductory language of (a) and substituted “There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this chapter” for “The following shall apply”; and added (a)(i).

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in (b)(i).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added (c)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (d)(ii) or subparagraph (d)(i)(I) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Laws 2009, ch. 73, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to property taxes assessed on or after January 1, 2008.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 121, § 4, appropriates up to $4,830,000 from the general fund to the department of revenue for the purposes of the act.

Laws 2008, ch. 101, § 2, states as follows:

“(a) Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

:

“(i) Two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) of the funds appropriated by 2004 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 121, Section 4 shall not revert and are hereby reappropriated to the department of revenue for the purposes of this act; and

“(ii) Funds appropriated under this section shall not lapse or revert until June 30, 2015.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 121, § 3, directs the department of revenue, on or before December 1, 2004, to provide a report to the joint revenue interim committee on the property tax relief program including an itemization for the refunds provided and all state and county administrative costs.

Applicability.—

Availability of a tax exemption was solely dependent on the use of the property, and it was therefore a question of fact, not of legality and the action claimed to be illegal was therefore not illegal as a matter of law, although it may as a matter of fact have been erroneous and this section therefore did not apply. Town of Pine Bluffs v. Eisele, 2017 WY 117, 403 P.3d 126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2017).

Standing of county commissioners board. —

Board of county commissioners lacked standing to appeal decision of state board of equalization, since board of county commissioners was not included in definition of “person” and was not otherwise provided with a right of appeal. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Redemption period. —

Tax sale purchaser’s tax deed was void because the purchaser’s notice stating the redemption period had passed did not strictly comply with the applicable statute, as the period extended to the county treasurer’s acceptance of a valid tax deed application. Montierth v. Deutsche Bank Nat'l Trust Co., 2018 WY 41, 415 P.3d 654,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2018).

Reimbursement claim. —

In a dispute between a tax sale purchaser and a mortgagee over the validity of the purchaser’s tax deed, the purchaser’s statutory reimbursement claims were not ripe because the mortgagee (1) had not sought to evict the purchaser, and (2) was not a “person redeeming real property.” Montierth v. Deutsche Bank Nat'l Trust Co., 2018 WY 41, 415 P.3d 654,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2018).

Construction with other law. —

This section cannot override the confidentiality requirements of §

34-1-142

, and the two statutes can be harmonized only if subsection (b)(i) of this section is subject to the restrictions of §

34-1-142

.Bender v. Decaria, 998 P.2d 953,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2000).

Amounts paid under protest. —

Proper determination of amount of taxes paid under protest was the difference between taxpayer's objective calculation of its tax obligation and the tax which was levied, and amount was not controlled by county treasurer's previous estimate. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Bowen, 979 P.2d 503,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1999) (decided under prior law).

Partial redemption. —

In declaratory judgment action brought by tax sale purchaser claiming ownership of property, summary judgment was properly granted for record property owners, since Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-13-108(e)(v) required that the tax sale purchaser serve the requisite notice on the owners personally prior to obtaining a valid tax deed, and her failure to do so rendered the tax deed void as to all the owners. Unlike other statutes, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-13-108(e)(v) does not specifically refer to Wyo. R. Civ. P. 4 in establishing the framework for serving the requisite notice; and even if Rule 4 applied, the purchaser did not comply with Rule 4 because the sheriff's deputy did not deliver the notice to the owner personally, leave it at his usual place of business, or at his dwelling house.
Thompson-Green v. Estate of Drobish, 2006 WY 126, 143 P.3d 897,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1950).

For article, “Defects — Tax Sale as Affecting Validity of Title,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 266.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-13-110.
Statute of limitations.

All personal property taxes not collected within ten (10) years from the time the taxes were levied shall be cancelled and are thereafter uncollectible.

Property omitted from prior year tax lists discovered by the county assessor shall be added to the assessment roll and taxes computed and collected for the period the property was omitted not exceeding five (5) prior years or since the last change in ownership, whichever is less.

Any person, county, municipality or political subdivision holding a certificate of purchase or tax deed issued for delinquent taxes has a lien against the real property which is subject to the certificate of purchase or tax deed to the extent of taxes, costs and penalties accrued plus interest, accruing penalties and the value of improvements placed on the real property by the lienholder or his assigns while lawfully in possession of the premises. The lien is superior to all other liens except those created by junior tax sales or payment of subsequent taxes by another person. The lien may be enforced in the district court of the county in which the real property lies or in any district court in which an action is filed in which the lienholder is made a defendant. The action shall be conducted in a manner similar to foreclosures of mortgages and sales thereunder. The decree may contain an order of sale directing the sheriff to advertise and sell the real property without appraisal and make a return of the proceedings within sixty (60) days. No action provided by this section may be commenced less than four (4) years nor more than ten (10) years from the date of the original tax sale.

Any person entitled to sales proceeds under W.S. 39-13-108(d)(iv)(C) may claim those amounts within two (2) years from the date of confirmation of the sale, or in the case of a person under a legal disability within one (1) year from removal of the disability. If the payment is unclaimed within two (2) years the proceeds shall be credited to the county sinking fund. If a person under a legal disability claims the proceeds within one (1) year following removal of the disability and the proceeds have been credited to the county sinking fund, the person shall be paid out of the county sinking fund.

No action for the recovery of real property sold for the nonpayment of taxes shall be maintained unless commenced within six (6) years after the date of sale for taxes.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Provision did not apply to mineral tax. —

District court's application of former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-3-102(b) (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-13-110(a)) did not require reversal in an oil production company's challenge to a Department of Revenue ruling changing the allocation of the company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because § 39-3-102(b) does not apply to unreported taxes in a self-reporting system. There is no statute of limitations for mineral tax collections. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).